print/tex/TeX3.14/contrib/tex/hyphen/hyphen.german.min.tex
% These are german hyphen patterns (in minor version for PC usuage)
% for use with TeX generated at
%              Rechenzentrum Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum
%              Universitaetsstrasse 150
%              D-4630 Bochum 1
%              West Germany
% as of 1988-10-10.
% Copyright Rechenzentrum der Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum 1988
%
% General permission for non-profit use is granted.
%
% For commercial use, contact the above address.
% (c/o Norbert Schwarz)
%
\patterns{.aa6l
.ab3a4s
.ab3ei
.abi2
.ab3it
.ab1l
.ab1r
.ab3u
.ad3o4r
.alti6
.ana3c
.an1e
.an1s
.ap1p
.ar6sc
.ar6ta
.ar6tei
.as2z
.aue6
.au2f1
.au2s
.aus3p
.be5erb
.be3na
.ber6t5r
.bie6r5
.bim6s5t
.brot3
.bru6s
.che6f5
.da2r
.dar5in
.dar5u
.dem7ents
.den6ka
.de5r6en
.de5sk
.des6pe
.de3sz
.dia1
.dias4
.dien4
.dy2s1
.ehren5
.eine6
.ei6n5eh
.en6der
.en6d5r
.en3k4
.en4t3r
.epo1
.er6ban
.er6b5ei
.er6bla
.er6d5um
.er3ei
.er5er
.er3in
.er1k
.er3o4b
.erwi5s
.er3zw
.es1p
.ex1a2
.ex3em
.fal6sc
.fe6sta
.flu4g3
.ga6ner
.ge3n4a
.ges6
.halb5
.halbe6
.hal6br
.haup4
.haupt5
.hau4t
.heima6
.he4r3e
.her6za
.he5x
.hin3
.hir6sc
.ho4c
.ho6la
.hy5o
.ima6ge
.in1
.ini6
.is5c
.kal6k5o
.ki6e
.kop4f
.lab6br
.liie6
.lo6s5k
.ma5d
.mi4t1
.no6top
.ob1l
.ob6st5e
.ole5
.or3c
.ort6s5e
.pe4re
.pe3ts
.ph6
.rau4m3
.re5an
.re1o
.ru5the
.sch4
.se5n6h
.se5ra
.si2e
.spi6ke
.st8
.sy2n
.tab6
.tan6kl
.te6e
.to6der
.um1
.un1
.une6
.ur1c
.ur5en
.ve6rin
.vol8l7end
.wah6l5
.wo6r
.wor3a
.wun4s
.zi4e
aa1c
aa2gr
aal5e
aa6r5a
a5arti
aa2s1t
aat2s
6aba
ab3art
1abdr
6abel
ab5erk
ab5err
ab5esse
1abf
1abg
ab1ir
1abko
a1bl
ab1la
5ablag
ab1lu
abma5c
3abn
ab1ra
ab1re
5a6brec
ab1ro
ab1s
3abtei
ab1ur
1abw
5abze
1abzu
a4ce.
a5chal
a5chan
ach5art
ach3au
a1che
ach6er.
a6ch5erf
a1chi
ach1l
ach3m
ach5n
a1cho
ach3re
a1chu
ach1w
ack1o
a1d
8ad.
a6d5ac
ad3ant
5addi
adi5en
1adj
5adle
ad1op
a2dre
3adres
adt5
1adv
a1e2d
a1er.
1aero
8afa
a2f1an
a2f1au
a6fentl
a2f1ex
af5rau
af1re
1afri
af6tra
aft5re
a6f5um
ag5abe
3a4gent
a5gla
ag5las
ag1lo
a1gn
ag2ne
1a2gog
a6g5und
a1ha
a1he
ah5ein
a4h3erh
a1hi
ahl1a
ah1le
ah4m3ar
ah1mu
ahn1a
a5ho
ahra6
ahr5ab
ah1re
ahre4s3
ah1ru
a1hu
ai3d2s
ai1e
aif6
a3inse
ai4re.
a5isch.
a3ismu
ais6n
aiso6
a1j
1akad
a4kade
a1ke
a1ki
1akko
5akro1
a1la
3alarm
alb5la
alb3st4
3album
al1c
a1le
a6l5e6be
a4l3ein
a6lert
5a6l5eth
1algi
al4gli
al3int
al4lab
al4l3ar
alle3g
a1lo
a6l5ob
al6schm
al4the
altist5
al4t3re
a1lu
alu5i
a6lur
alu1t
a6mate
a6meise
am6m5ei
am2n
amp4f3a
am6schw
am2ta
a1mu
a3nac
a1nad
anadi5e
an3ako
an5alg
an3alp
3analy
an3ame
an3ara
a1nas
an5asti
a1nat
ander5a
ande4s3
an1ec
an5eis
an1e2k
4aner.
a6n5erd
a6n5erke
1anfa
3angab
an3gli
ang6lis
an2gn
3angri
ang5sal
ang5t6
ani5g
ani4ka
an1kl
an6kno
an4kro
1anl
anma5c
anmar4
anne4s3
a1no
5a6n1o2d
5a6n3oma
5a6nord
1anr
5ansic
an4soz
3anspr
an1st
5anstal
an1s2z
5antenn
an1th
3antra
a5ny
an4z3ed
5anzeig
5anzieh
3anzug
a1os
a1pa
3apfel
a2ph1t
a1pi
8apl
apo1c
apo1s
a6poste
a6poth
1appa
ap1pr
a1pr
ap6sa
a1ra
a4r3af
ar3all
3arbei
2arbt
ar1c
2a1re
ar3ein
ar2gl
2a1ri
ari5es
ar6les
ar4nan
ar5o6ch
ar1o2d
a1rol
ar3ony
a3ros
ar5ox
ar6schl
art5eig
ar6t5ri
a1ru
a1ry
1arzt
a6schec
asch5l
asch3m
a6schn
a3s4hi
as1pa
as5tev
1asth
a6stoc
a1str
ast3re
a1ta
ata5c
ata5pl
a1te
a6teli
aten5a
ate5ran
a1th
at3hal
1athl
4a1ti
5atlant
3atlas
5atmen.
3atmun
a1to
a6t5ops
ato6ra
a6t5ort
6a1tr
a6t5ru
at2t1h
a1tu
atz1w
au1a
au6bre
auch5a
au1e
aue4l
5aufent
3aufga
1aufn
auf1t
3auftr
3auge.
au4kle
6aum
aum5p
1ausb
ausch5w
1ausf
1ausg
au4sta
aus5tri
1ausw
1ausz
au1th
1auto
a1v
ave5r6a
aver6i
a1w
a6wes
a1x
a2xia
a6xio
a1ya
a1z
azi5er.
1ba
ba1na
ban6kl
ba5ot
bardi6n
ba1ro
basten6
bau3sp
2b1b
b2bli
6b1c
2b1d
1be
be1a
be1ch
8becke.
be5el
be1en
be5eta
bef2
be1g2
bei1s
6b5eisen
bei3tr
b8el
belle6n5
belu3t
be3nac
bend6o
be6n5ers
be6nerw
be4nor
ben4s5e6
be1o2
be6pa
be1ra
ber1r
bes5erh
bes2p
be6spu
be5tha
bet5sc
be1un
be1ur
8bex
be6zwec
bfe6st5e
2b1g2
bga2s5
bge1
2b1h
bhole6
1bi
bi1bl
b6ie
bi1el
bi1la
bi1na
bi4nok
bi5str
bi6stu
bit4t5r
b1j
2b1k2
bl8
b6la.
6blag
1blat
3blau.
b6lav
3ble.
b1leb
b1led
8b1leh
8bleih
b3lein
blei3s
ble4m3o
6blich
2blig
b4lind
b2lio
5blit
b4litz
b1loh
5blum
4blun
blut3a
blut5sc
2b1m
2b1n
1bo
bo1ch
bo5d6s
boe5
8bonk
bo1ra
b1ort
2b1p2
b1q
1br
brail6
bre4a
b5red
8b5riem
b6riga
6b5rit
bro1s
b1rup
b2ruz
2bs
b2s1ar
b1sc
bs3erl
bs3erz
bs6ku
b1s2p
bst1h
bs4zi
2b1t
b2t1h
1bu
bu1ie
bul6k
6b1v
2b1w
1by1
by6te.
2b1z
bzi1s
1ca
cag6
ca6re
ca5y
c1c
1ce
celi4c
celich5
c8h
2ch.
1chae
ch1ah
ch3akt
cha6mer
8chanz
5chara
3chari
5chato
1chef
6chei
ch3eil
ch3eis
6chf
6chins
8chj
chl6
5chlor
6ch2m
6chn6
5cho.
ch3ren
ch6res
4chs
4cht
cht5ha
cht3hi
5chthon
ch6tin
6chuh
chu6la
6ch3unt
chut6t
1chy
1ci
ci5tr
c2k
2ck.
ck1ei
4ckh
ck3l
ck3n
ck1r
2cks
c2l
1co
con6ne
cos6t
1c6r
8c1t
1cu
1cy
1da
2dabg
6dabt
6dabw
da2gr
6d5alk
dan6ce.
dani5er
2danl
danla6
6dans
6danzu
d1ap
2d1arb
4d3arc
2d1art
2d1auf
2d1aus
2d1b
2d1c
2d1d
d5de
d3d2h
1de
6deal
de5an
de5ar
de3cha
de1e
defe6
6deff
2d1ehr
5d4eic
de5isc
del6s5e
de4mag
8denge.
de5o6d
2deol
de5ram
der5ein
der1r
der5um
de4s3am
de4s3an
de4sau
de6sil
de4sin
des1p
de6spo
de4spr
de2su
de5us.
2d1f
df2l
2d1g
2d1h
1di
di5ara
dice5
di3chr
di5ena
di5gn
di1la
di1na
6dinf
4d3inh
2d1ins
di5o6d
di3p4t
dis1p
di6s5to
dis5tra
d1j
6dje
2dju
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n6
dnje6
1do
6d5ony
do3ran
6dord
2d1org
6d5ort
dor4t3h
do6ste
6doth
2d1p2
dr6
1drah
d5rand
6dre.
2d1rec
5d6reck
4dreg
4d3reic
6d1ren
2drer
6d5rh
1dria
d1ric
droi6
dro5x
1dru
2ds
d6san
d1sc
5d6scha.
5dschik
8dsl
d1sp
d4spak
ds2po
d1st
2dt
d1ta
d1te
d1ti
d1to
dt1s6
d1tu
1du
du1b6
du1e
duf4t3r
4d3uh
du5ie
8dumw
2d1und
6d5unt
dur2c
durch3
6d5url
6dursa
du1s
2d1v
2d1w
2d1z
ea4ben
e1ac
e1ah
e1akt
e1al.
e5alf
e1alg
e1alk
e3all
e5alp
e3alt
e5alw
e1am
e1and
ea6nim
e1ar.
e5arf
e1ark
e5arm
e2at
ea5t6l
e5att
e6au.
e1aus
e1b
e6b5am
eb4lie
eb4ser
eb4s3in
e1che
e1chi
ech3m
ech3n
ech1r
e1chu
eck5an
e5cl
e1d
edoni5e
ee3a
ee3e
e1ei
eei4s3t
ee6lend
e1ell
e1erd
ee5r6e
eeres5
ee6tat
e1ex
3effek
ef4fli
ef2fr
e1fl
e1fr
ef3rom
ege6ra
eglo6si
1egy
e1ha
e6h5ach
eh5ans
e1he
e1hi
ehl3a
eh1le
eh1mu
ehn5ec
e1ho
ehr1a
eh1re
eh1ri
eh1ru
ehr5um
e1hu
eh1w
e1hy
ei1a
eia6s
ei6bar
eich3a
eich5r
ei4dar
ei6d5ei
ei3d4sc
ei1e
3eifri
1eign
eil1d
ei6mab
ein1a2
ein1g
ein1k
ei6n5od
ei4nor
ei1o
e1irr
ei5ru
ei6s5ent
ei5spr
ei4t3al
eit3ar
eit1h
ei6thi
ei6t5um
e1j
1ekd
e1ke
e1ki
e1k2l
e1kn
ekni4
e1la
e2l1al
6elan
e6lanf
el3arm
e6l3art
5e6lasti
e6lauge
e1le
6elef
ele6h
e6l5ehe
1elek
3eleme
e6lemen
el5epi
e4l3err
e6l5ersc
ele1s2
elf2l
elg2
e6l5ins
4e1lo
e4l3ofe
el5te
5eltern
e1lu
elut2
4emo
emo5s
1empf
1empt
1emto
e1mu
emurk4
emurks5
en5a6ben
en5achs
en5ack
e1nad
en5af
en5all
en3alt
en1am
en3an.
en3ant
en1a6p
en1ar
en1a6s
6e1nat
en3auf
en3aus
en2ce
enda6l
end5erf
end5erg
4ene.
en5eck
e6n5ehr
e6n5eim
en3eis
6enem.
6enen
4ener.
e4nerg
en5e6ro
en5erw
6enes
e6n5ess
e2nex
en3glo
2eni
enks6
enni6s5
ennos4
e1no
e6nober
en5opf
e4n3ord
en4san
en5s6por
en5t6ag
enta5go
en6tid
3entla
ent5ric
5entwu
e3ny
eo1c
e5o6fe
e1on.
e3onf
e5onk
e5onl
e5ops
e5or.
eo5r6h
eo1t
e1pa
e6p5e6g
ep5ent
e1p2f
e1pi
5epid
e6pidem
e1pl
5epos
e6pos.
ep4p3a
e1pr
e1q
e1ra.
e5rabel
er5a6ben
e5rabi
er3abs
er3ach
era5e
era5k6l
er3all
er3amt
e3rand
e3rane
er3ans
e1rap
e3rari
er3a6si
e1rat
erat3s
er3auf
e3raum
3erbse
er1c
2e1re
e5re.
er3eck
er5egg
er5e2h
er5einr
e4r3enm
er5ero
er5erst
e6r5erz
er3ess
5ergebn
er2gh
2e1ri
eri5ak
e6r5iat
e4r3ind
er5inst
e6r5int
er5klo
er6nab
3ernst
e1ro
6ero.
er5obs
er1o2f
6eroi
e2r1or
er5ox
ersch4
er6t5ein
er2t1h
er5t6her
2e1ru
e4r3uhr
er3ums
e5rus
5erwerb
e1ry
e6s5a6v
e1sc
esch4l
ese1a
es5ebe
eserve5
es5ill
es3int
e2sl
e1sp
espei6s5
es2po
es2pu
e6stabs
e6st5ak
est5ang
est3ar
e1str
est5res
es3ur
e2sz
e1ta
etab2
etari5e
e1te
eten6te
et5hal
e5thel
e1ti
1etn
e1to
e1tr
et3rec
et6tei
et2th
et2t1r
e1tu
etu1s
eu1a2
eu1e
eu5fe
euin5
e1um.
eu6nio
e5unter
eu1o6
eu5p
5europa
eu1sp
eu5str
e1v
eval6s
eve5r6en
ever4i
e1w
e2wig
ex1or
1exp
1extr
ey3er.
e1z
1fa
fa6ch5i
fa6del
fa5el.
fal4l3o
fa1na
fan4gr
6fanl
6fap
far6ba
far4bl
far6r5a
2f1art
6farz
fa1sc
6faug
fa3y
2f1b2
6f1c
6f1d
1fe
6f5eck
fe6dr
6feif
f6eim
f5eis
8femp
fe5rant
fe6str
fe6stum
fet6ta
fex1
2f1f
f6f5arm
f5fe
ffe5in
ffe6la
ff4lie
ff6s5ta
ff5t
2f1g2
fgewen6
2f1h
1fi
fid4
fi3ds
fieb4
fi1la
fil4m5a
fi1na
f8is
fi6u
f1j
2f1k2
5flagg
f6lanz
2flig
f2lix
4f3lon
5flop
3flor
2f1m
2f1n
1fo
foh1
fo6na
2f1op
fo5ra
fo5ru
6f5otte
2f1p6
f1q
fr6
f5ram
frei1
f3reic
4f3rest
f1rib
6frig
1fris
2fs
f1sc
f2s1er
f1st
2ft
f1tak
ft5auf
f1te
ft5e6h
ftere6
ft1h
f1ti
f1tr
ft5rad
ft2sa
ft1sc
f1tu
ftwi3d4
ft1z
1fu
6f5ums
fun4k5a
2f1v
6f1w
2f1z
1ga
8gabz
g3a4der
ga5isc
4gak
6g5amt
ga1na
gan5erb
gan6g5a
ga5nj
6ganl
6garb
2g1arc
2g1arm
ga5ro
6g3arti
ga6stre
2g1atm
6g5auf
gau5fr
2g1b
6gd
1ge
ge1a2
ge6an
ge1e2
ge6es
gef2
ge1g2l
ge1im
4g3eise
geist5r
ge5nau.
gen5k
gen5sp
ge1or
ge1ra
ge6rab
ge1s
ges2p
4g3ex3
2g1g
g1ha
6g1hei
5ghel.
g5henn
6g5hi
g1ho
1ghr
1gi
gi5la
gi1na
4g3ins
gi3str
2g1k
3glad
g5lag
glan4z3
1glas
5glaub
g3lauf
1gle.
g5leb
3gleic
g3lein
5gleis
1glem
2g1ler
g2lie
3glied
1g2lik
1g2lim
g6lio
1gloa
5glom
1glon
1glop
g1los
g4loss
g5luf
1g2ly
2g1m
gn6
6gn.
1gna
2gnah
g1nas
g4nett
g6nie
g3nis
1gno
1go
goe1
8gof
6g5oh
goni5e
6gonist
go1ra
2g1p2
g1q
1gr6
g5rahm
gra4s3t
6g1rec
gre6ge
4g3reic
g5reit
gri4e
6g5riem
5grif
4grig
6groh
2grot
4grut
2gs
gs1ab
gs1ak
gs1an
g2s1ar
g5sat
gs1au
g1sc
g2s1ef
g6s5ein
g2s1er
gs1in
g2s1o
gso2r
gs1pa
g4stru
g2s1u
2g1t
g2t1h
1gu
gu5as
gu2e
2gue.
6gued
4g3uh
8gunt
gut1
gu2tu
4g1v
2g1w
g1z
1haa
hade4n
ha5el.
haf6tr
2hal.
hal4b5a
6hale
ha1na
han6ge.
2hani
h5anth
6hanz
6harb
h3arbe
h3arme
ha5ro
ha2t1h
h1atm
hau6san
h1b2
h1c
h1d
he2bl
he3cho
h3echt
he5d6s
he5erf
5heft
h1eif
2hein
he3ism
he5ist.
hek6ta
he6l5ein
8helt
he6mer
1hemm
6h1emp
hen5end
hen5klo
hen6tri
he2nu
8heo
he8q
her3ab
he5rak
her3an
4herap
her3au
h3erbi
he4r3um
her6z5er
he4spe
he1st
heta6
het5am
he5th
heu3sc
he1xa
hey5e
h1f2
h1g
h1h
h1iat
hie6r5i
hi5kt
hil1a2
hil4fr
hi5nak
hin4ta
hi2nu
hi5ob
hi1sp
hi1th
hi5tr
5hitz
h1k2
hlabb4
hla4ga
hla6gr
h5lai
h1las
h1led
h1ler
h5ler.
h2lif
h2lim
hl5int
h2lip
h2lit
h6lor
h3lose
hme5e
h2nee
h2nei
hn3eig
h2nel
hne4p3f
h6netz
h2nip
h2nit
h1nol
hn5sp
h2nuc
h2nud
h2nul
hoch1
1hoh
2hoi
hol3ar
1holz
ho1ra
6horg
5horn.
ho3sl
ho2s1p
h1p6
hpi6
h1q
6hr
h1rai
h5raum
h1red
h4r3erb
hrg2
h1ric
hr5ins
h2rom
hr6t5erl
hr2t1h
hr6t5ra
h6rum
hr1z
h4s3ach
h6s5amt
h6sau
h1sc
h6s5ec
h6s5erl
h4sob
h1sp
h1str
h4s3tum
h6sun
hs5und
h5ta.
h5tab
ht3ac
ht1ak
ht3ang
h3tanz
ht1ar
ht1at
h5taub
ht1c
h1te
h2t1ec
ht3eff
ht3ehe
h4t3eif
h4t3ein
ht3eis
h6temp
h4t3erh
h6t5ersc
h6t5erst
h2t1eu
h4t3ex
ht1he
ht5hu
h1ti
ht5rak
ht4s3ah
ht6sau
ht1sc
ht6sex
h1tu
htz8
hub5l
hu6b5r
h5uhr.
h5up.
h1v
h5weib
h3weis
h1z
i5adn
i1af
i5ak.
i1al.
i1a2l1a
i1alb
i1ald
i5alei
i1alf
i1alg
i3alh
i1alk
i1all
i1alp
i1alr
i1als
i1alt
i1alv
i5alw
i3alz
i1an.
ia5na
i1ang
i3ank
i5ann
i1ant
i1anz
i6apo
i1ar.
ia6rab
i1as.
ia5sc
i1asm
i1ass
i5ast.
i1at.
i5ats
i1au
i5azz
i6b5eig
i6b5eis
i4blis
i6brig
i6b5unt
i1che
ich5ei
i6cherb
i1chi
ich3l
ich3m
ich1n
i1cho
ich4sp
icht5an
icht3r
i1chu
ich1w
ick6s5te
ic5l
i1d
id3arm
3ideol
i6diot
id1t
ie1a
ie6b5ar
iebe4s3
ie2bl
ieb1r
ie4bre
ie2dr
ie6f5ad
ief5f
ie2f1l
ie4fro
ief1t
i1ei
ie4l3ec
i1en.
i3end
i3enf
i5enn
ien6ne.
i1enp
i1enr
i5ensa
i5env
i3enz
ie5o
ier3a
iera4b
ie4rap
ie4rec
ie6r5ein
ie6r5eis
i3ern.
ie6s5che
ie5the
ie6t5ri
i1ett
ie5un
iex5
2if
if5ang
i6fau
if2fl
if1le
i5f6lie
i1fre
ift5a
if6t5r
ig3art
2ige
ig5he
i5gla
ig2ni
ig3rot
ig1sp
i1ha
i1he
i1hi
ih1n
ih1r
i1hu
ih1w
8i1i
ii2s
ii2t
i1j
i1k
i6kak
i6kes
i8kn
i6k5unt
2il
i1la.
i5lac
i1lag
il3ans
i5las
i1lau
il6auf
i1le
il2fl
ilf2s
il3ipp
i1lo
i1lu
imb2
imme6l5a
i1mu
i1nat
in1au
8ind.
in4d3an
indes5e
5index
ind2r
3indus
i5nec
i2n1ei
i6nete
ine6x
3infek
1info
5ingeni
ing5s6o
3inhab
8ini
ini5er.
5inj
i1no
in3o4ku
in1sp
5inspe
3insti
3instr
ins4ze
5intere
5interv
in3the
in3t2r
i5ny
2io
io1c
io2di
ioi8
i1ol.
i1om.
i1on.
i5onb
i1on2s1
i1ont
i5ops
i1or.
i3oral
io3rat
i5orc
i1os.
i1ot.
2ip
i1pa
i1pi
ipi3el
i1p2l
i1pr
i1q
i1ra
i1re
i1ri
ir2m1o2
i1ro
ir5rho
ir6sch5r
i5rus
i5ry
i2s1au
isch5m
i5schne
isch3r
isch5wu
ise3ra
i6s5erh
isi6de
is4kop
is6por
i5sty
i1ta
it5ab.
i2t1a2m
i1te
i1thi
i1tho
i5thr
i1ti
